California statutes. Public Resources Code
 with the provisions of the agreement or contract. As to these properties, the agricultural subsidy fees in existence as of December 31, 1984, shall be paid and allocated within the City of Carlsbad, or on projects outside the city that benefit agricultural programs within the city, in accordance with the provisions of the agricultural subsidy program as it existed on September 30, 1984.

(c) Any agricultural conversion fees collected pursuant to the agricultural subsidy program and not deposited in the agricultural improvement fund in accordance with the local coastal program or that have not been expended in the form of agricultural subsidies assigned to landowners by the local coastal program land use policy plan on January 1, 1985, shall be used by the Department of General Services to reimburse the party that paid the fees if no agreements or contracts have been entered into or to the original parties to the agreements or contracts referred
 to in subdivision (b) in proportion to the amount of fees paid by the parties. However, if the property subject to the fee was under option at the time that the original agreement or contract was entered into and the optionee was a party to the agricultural subsidy agreement, payments allocable to that property shall be paid to the optionee in the event the optionee has exercised the option. Reimbursements under this section shall be paid within 90 days after January 1, 1985, or payment of the fee, whichever occurs later, and only after waiver by the party being reimbursed of any potential legal rights resulting from enactment of this section.

(d) (1) Any person entitled to reimbursement of fees under subdivision (c) shall file a claim with the Department of General Services, which shall determine the validity of the claim and pay that person a pro rata share based on the relative amounts of fees paid under the local
 coastal program or any agreement or contract entered pursuant thereto.

(2) There is hereby appropriated to the Department of General Services the fees referred to in subdivision (c), for the purpose of making refunds under this section.

(e) Notwithstanding any geographical limitation contained in this division, funds deposited pursuant to subdivision (b) may be expended for physical or institutional development improvements needed to facilitate long-term agricultural production within the City of Carlsbad. These funds may be used to construct improvements outside the coastal zone boundaries in San Diego County if the improvements are not inconsistent with the Carlsbad local coastal program and the State Coastal Conservancy determines that the improvements will benefit agricultural production within the coastal zone of the City of Carlsbad.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 272.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30171.5.

(a) The amount of the mitigation fee for development on nonprime agricultural lands in the coastal zone in the City of Carlsbad that lie outside of the areas described in subdivision (f) of Section 30170 and subdivision (b) of Section 30171 shall be determined in the applicable segment of the local coastal program of the City of Carlsbad, but shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), per acre. All mitigation fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund.

(b) All mitigation fees collected pursuant to this section are hereby appropriated to, and shall be expended by, the State Coastal Conservancy in the following order of priority:

(1) Restoration of natural resources and wildlife habitat in Batiquitos Lagoon.

(2) Development of an interpretive center at Buena Vista Lagoon.

(3) Provision of access to public beaches in the City of Carlsbad.

(4) Any other project or activity benefiting or enhancing the use of natural resources, including open field cultivated floriculture, in the coastal zone in the City of Carlsbad that is provided for in the local coastal program of the City of Carlsbad.

(c) The State Coastal Conservancy may establish a special account in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund and deposit mitigation fees collected pursuant to this section in the special account. Any interest accruing on that money in the special account shall be expended pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Not less than 50 percent of collected and bonded mitigation fees shall be expended for the purpose specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(e) Other than to mitigate the agricultural conversion impacts for which they are collected, none of the mitigation fees collected pursuant to this section shall be used for elements of a project which cause that project to be in compliance with this division or to mitigate a project which would otherwise be inconsistent with this division. When reviewing a potential project for consistency with this subdivision, the State Coastal Conservancy shall consult with the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 513, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30172.

In the San Diego County, an area consisting of approximately 180 acres lying west and south of Palomar Airport as shown on Map 155, which has been placed on file with the Secretary of State on April 22, 1980, shall be excluded from the coastal zone after the City Engineer of the City of Carlsbad approves and the commission certifies a drainage plan for the area, pursuant to the commission’s interim permit authority, which plan the city shall implement and enforce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 170, Sec. 4.   Effective June 12, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

30174.

Notwithstanding the maps adopted pursuant to Section 17 of Chapter 1330 of the Statutes of 1976, as amended by Section 29 of Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1976, the inland boundary of the coastal zone, as shown on detailed coastal map 157 adopted by the commission on March 1, 1977, shall be amended to conform to the inland boundary shown on map A which is hereby adopted by reference and which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State and the commission on the date of enactment of this section.

The areas deleted and added to the coastal zone which are specifically shown on map A are in the County of San Diego and are generally described as follows: 

(a) In the vicinity of the intersection of Del Mar Heights Road and the San Diego Freeway, approximately 250 acres are excluded as specifically shown on map A.

(b) In the vicinity of the intersection of Carmel Valley Road and the San Diego Freeway, approximately 45 acres are added as specifically shown on map A.

(c) Near the head of the south branch of Los Penasquitos Canyon, the boundary is moved seaward to the five-mile limit as described in Section 30103 and as specifically shown on map A.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Coastal Resources Planning and Management Policies [30200. - 30270.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [30200. - 30200.]

30200.

(a) Consistent with the coastal zone values cited in Section 30001 and the basic goals set forth in Section 30001.5, and except as may be otherwise specifically provided in this division, the policies of this chapter shall constitute the standards by which the adequacy of local coastal programs, as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500), and the permissibility of proposed developments subject to the provisions of this division are determined. All public agencies carrying out or supporting activities outside the coastal zone that could have a direct impact on resources within the coastal zone shall consider the effect of such actions on coastal zone resources in order to assure that these policies are achieved.

(b) Where the commission or any local government in implementing the provisions of this division identifies a conflict between the policies of this chapter, Section 30007.5 shall be utilized to resolve the conflict and the resolution of such conflicts shall be supported by appropriate findings setting forth the basis for the resolution of identified policy conflicts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 8.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Public Access [30210. - 30214.]

30210.

In carrying out the requirement of Section 4 of Article X of the California Constitution, maximum access, which shall be conspicuously posted, and recreational opportunities shall be provided for all the people consistent with public safety needs and the need to protect public rights, rights of private property owners, and natural resource areas from overuse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1075.)
-------------------------------------------

30211.

Development shall not interfere with the public’s right of access to the sea where acquired through use or legislative authorization, including, but not limited to, the use of dry sand and rocky coastal beaches to the first line of terrestrial vegetation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1331.)
-------------------------------------------

30212.

(a) Public access from the nearest public roadway to the shoreline and along the coast shall be provided in new development projects except where (1) it is inconsistent with public safety, military security needs, or the protection of fragile coastal resources, (2) adequate access exists nearby, or (3) agriculture would be adversely affected. Dedicated accessway shall not be required to be opened to public use until a public agency or private association agrees to accept responsibility for maintenance and liability of the accessway.

(b) For purposes of this section, “new development” does not include:

(1) Replacement of any structure pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (g) of Section 30610.

(2) The demolition and reconstruction of a single-family residence; provided, that the reconstructed residence shall not exceed either the floor area, height or bulk of the former structure by more than 10 percent, and that the reconstructed residence shall be sited in the same location on the affected property as the former structure.

(3) Improvements to any structure which do not change the intensity of its use, which do not increase either the floor area, height, or bulk of the structure by more than 10 percent, which do not block or impede public access, and which do not result in a seaward encroachment by the structure.

(4) The reconstruction or repair of any seawall; provided, however, that the reconstructed or repaired seawall is not seaward of the location of the former structure.

(5) Any repair or maintenance activity for which the commission has determined, pursuant to Section 30610, that a coastal development permit will be required unless the commission determines that the activity will have an adverse impact on lateral public access along the beach.

As used in this subdivision, “bulk” means total interior cubic volume as measured from the exterior surface of the structure.

(c) Nothing in this division shall restrict public access nor shall it excuse the performance of duties and responsibilities of public agencies which are required by Sections 66478.1 to 66478.14, inclusive, of the Government Code and by Section 4 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 744, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30212.5.

Wherever appropriate and feasible, public facilities, including parking areas or facilities, shall be distributed throughout an area so as to mitigate against the impacts, social and otherwise, of overcrowding or overuse by the public of any single area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30213.

Lower cost visitor and recreational facilities shall be protected, encouraged, and, where feasible, provided. Developments providing public recreational opportunities are preferred.

The commission shall not: (1) require that overnight room rentals be fixed at an amount certain for any privately owned and operated hotel, motel, or other similar visitor-serving facility located on either public or private lands; or (2) establish or approve any method for the identification of low or moderate income persons for the purpose of determining eligibility for overnight room rentals in any such facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30214.

(a) The public access policies of this article shall be implemented in a manner that takes into account the need to regulate the time, place, and manner of public access depending on the facts and circumstances in each case including, but not limited to, the following: 

(1) Topographic and geologic site characteristics. 

(2) The capacity of the site to sustain use and at what level of intensity. 

(3) The appropriateness of limiting public access to the right to pass and repass depending on such factors as the fragility of the natural resources in the area and the proximity of the access area to adjacent residential uses. 

(4) The need to provide for the management of access areas so as to protect the privacy of adjacent property owners and to protect the aesthetic values of the area by providing for the collection of litter. 

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the public access policies of this article be carried out in a reasonable manner that considers the equities and that balances the rights of the individual property owner with the public’s constitutional right of access pursuant to Section 4 of Article X of the California Constitution. Nothing in this section or any amendment thereto shall be construed as a limitation on the rights guaranteed to the public under Section 4 of Article X of the California Constitution. 

(c) In carrying out the public access policies of this article, the commission and any other responsible public agency shall consider and encourage the utilization of innovative access management techniques, including, but not limited to, agreements with private organizations which would minimize management costs and encourage the use of volunteer programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Recreation [30220. - 30224.]

30220.

Coastal areas suited for water-oriented recreational activities that cannot readily be provided at inland water areas shall be protected for such uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30221.

Oceanfront land suitable for recreational use shall be protected for recreational use and development unless present and foreseeable future demand for public or commercial recreational activities that could be accommodated on the property is already adequately provided for in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 380.)
-------------------------------------------

30222.

The use of private lands suitable for visitor-serving commercial recreational facilities designed to enhance public opportunities for coastal recreation shall have priority over private residential, general industrial, or general commercial development, but not over agriculture or coastal-dependent industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30222.5.

Oceanfront land that is suitable for coastal dependent aquaculture shall be protected for that use, and proposals for aquaculture facilities located on those sites shall be given priority, except over other coastal dependent developments or uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 589.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30223.

Upland areas necessary to support coastal recreational uses shall be reserved for such uses, where feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30224.

Increased recreational boating use of coastal waters shall be encouraged, in accordance with this division, by developing dry storage areas, increasing public launching facilities, providing additional berthing space in existing harbors, limiting non-water-dependent land uses that congest access corridors and preclude boating support facilities, providing harbors of refuge, and by providing for new boating facilities in natural harbors, new protected water areas, and in areas dredged from dry land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Marine Environment [30230. - 30236.]

30230.

Marine resources shall be maintained, enhanced, and, where feasible, restored. Special protection shall be given to areas and species of special biological or economic significance. Uses of the marine environment shall be carried out in a manner that will sustain the biological productivity of coastal waters and that will maintain healthy populations of all species of marine organisms adequate for long-term commercial, recreational, scientific, and educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30231.

The biological productivity and the quality of coastal waters, streams, wetlands, estuaries, and lakes appropriate to maintain optimum populations of marine organisms and for the protection of human health shall be maintained and, where feasible, restored through, among other means, minimizing adverse effects of waste water discharges and entrainment, controlling runoff, preventing depletion of ground water supplies and substantial interference with surface waterflow, encouraging waste water reclamation, maintaining natural vegetation buffer areas that protect riparian habitats, and minimizing alteration of natural streams.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30232.

Protection against the spillage of crude oil, gas, petroleum products, or hazardous substances shall be provided in relation to any development or transportation of such materials. Effective containment and cleanup facilities and procedures shall be provided for accidental spills that do occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30233.

(a) The diking, filling, or dredging of open coastal waters, wetlands, estuaries, and lakes shall be permitted in accordance with other applicable provisions of this division, where there is no feasible less environmentally damaging alternative, and where feasible mitigation measures have been provided to minimize adverse environmental effects, and shall be limited to the following:

(1) New or expanded port, energy, and coastal-dependent industrial facilities, including commercial fishing facilities.

(2) Maintaining existing, or restoring previously dredged, depths in existing navigational channels, turning basins, vessel berthing and mooring areas, and boat
 launching ramps.

(3) In open coastal waters, other than wetlands, including streams, estuaries, and lakes, new or expanded boating facilities and the placement of structural pilings for public recreational piers that provide public access and recreational opportunities.

(4) Incidental public service purposes, including, but not limited to, burying cables and pipes or inspection of piers and maintenance of existing intake and outfall lines.

(5) Mineral extraction, including sand for restoring beaches, except in environmentally sensitive areas.

(6) Restoration purposes.

(7) Nature study, aquaculture, or similar resource-dependent activities.

(b) Dredging and spoils disposal shall be planned and carried out to avoid significant disruption to marine and wildlife habitats and water circulation. Dredge spoils suitable for beach replenishment should be transported for these purposes to appropriate beaches or into suitable longshore current systems.

(c) In addition to the other provisions of this section, diking, filling, or dredging in existing estuaries and wetlands shall maintain or enhance the functional capacity of the wetland or estuary. Any alteration of coastal wetlands identified by the Department of Fish and Wildlife, including, but not limited to, the 19 coastal wetlands identified in its report entitled, “Acquisition
 Priorities for the Coastal Wetlands of California”, shall be limited to very minor incidental public facilities, restorative measures, nature study, commercial fishing facilities in Bodega Bay, and development in already developed parts of south San Diego Bay, if otherwise in accordance with this division.

For the purposes of this section, “commercial fishing facilities in Bodega Bay” means that not less than 80 percent of all boating facilities proposed to be developed or improved, where the improvement would create additional berths in Bodega Bay, shall be designed and used for commercial fishing activities.

(d) Erosion control and flood control facilities constructed on watercourses can impede the movement of sediment and nutrients that would otherwise be carried by storm runoff into coastal waters. To facilitate the continued delivery of these sediments to the littoral zone, whenever feasible, the
 material removed from these facilities may be placed at appropriate points on the shoreline in accordance with other applicable provisions of this division, where feasible mitigation measures have been provided to minimize adverse environmental effects. Aspects that shall be considered before issuing a coastal development permit for these purposes are the method of placement, time of year of placement, and sensitivity of the placement area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 2.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30234.

Facilities serving the commercial fishing and recreational boating industries shall be protected and, where feasible, upgraded. Existing commercial fishing and recreational boating harbor space shall not be reduced unless the demand for those facilities no longer exists or adequate substitute space has been provided. Proposed recreational boating facilities shall, where feasible, be designed and located in such a fashion as not to interfere with the needs of the commercial fishing industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30234.5.

The economic, commercial, and recreational importance of fishing activities shall be recognized and protected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 802, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30235.

Revetments, breakwaters, groins, harbor channels, seawalls, cliff retaining walls, and other such construction that alters natural shoreline processes shall be permitted when required to serve coastal-dependent uses or to protect existing structures or public beaches in danger from erosion and when designed to eliminate or mitigate adverse impacts on local shoreline sand supply. Existing marine structures causing water stagnation contributing to pollution problems and fishkills should be phased out or upgraded where feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30236.

Channelizations, dams, or other substantial alterations of rivers and streams shall incorporate the best mitigation measures feasible, and be limited to (1) necessary water supply projects, (2) flood control projects where no other method for protecting existing structures in the flood plain is feasible and where such protection is necessary for public safety or to protect existing development, or (3) developments where the primary function is the improvement of fish and wildlife habitat.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Land Resources [30240. - 30244.]

30240.

(a) Environmentally sensitive habitat areas shall be protected against any significant disruption of habitat values, and only uses dependent on those resources shall be allowed within those areas.

(b) Development in areas adjacent to environmentally sensitive habitat areas and parks and recreation areas shall be sited and designed to prevent impacts which would significantly degrade those areas, and shall be compatible with the continuance of those habitat and recreation areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

30241.

The maximum amount of prime agricultural land shall be maintained in agricultural production to assure the protection of the areas’ agricultural economy, and conflicts shall be minimized between agricultural and urban land uses through all of the following:

(a) By establishing stable boundaries separating urban and rural areas, including, where necessary, clearly defined buffer areas to minimize conflicts between agricultural and urban land uses.

(b) By limiting conversions of agricultural lands around the periphery of urban areas to the lands where the viability of existing agricultural use is already severely limited by conflicts with urban uses or where the conversion of the lands would complete a logical and viable neighborhood and contribute to the establishment of a stable limit to urban development.

(c) By permitting the conversion of agricultural land surrounded by urban uses where the conversion of the land would be consistent with Section 30250.

(d) By developing available lands not suited for agriculture prior to the conversion of agricultural lands.

(e) By assuring that public service and facility expansions and nonagricultural development do not impair agricultural viability, either through increased assessment costs or degraded air and water quality.

(f) By assuring that all divisions of prime agricultural lands, except those conversions approved pursuant to subdivision (b), and all development adjacent to prime agricultural lands shall not diminish the productivity of prime agricultural lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 43, Sec. 10.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30241.5.

(a) If the viability of existing agricultural uses is an issue pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30241 as to any local coastal program or amendment to any certified local coastal program submitted for review and approval under this division, the determination of “viability” shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of an economic feasibility evaluation containing at least both of the following elements:

(1) An analysis of the gross revenue from the agricultural products grown in the area for the five years immediately preceding the date of the filing of a proposed local coastal program or an amendment to any local coastal program.

(2) An analysis of the operational expenses, excluding the cost of land, associated with the production of the agricultural products grown in the area for the five years immediately preceding the date of the filing of a proposed local coastal program or an amendment to any local coastal program.

For purposes of this subdivision, “area” means a geographic area of sufficient size to provide an accurate evaluation of the economic feasibility of agricultural uses for those lands included in the local coastal program or in the proposed amendment to a certified local coastal program.

(b) The economic feasibility evaluation required by subdivision (a) shall be submitted to the commission, by the local government, as part of its submittal of a local coastal program or an amendment to any local coastal program. If the local government determines that it does not have the staff with the necessary expertise to conduct the economic feasibility evaluation, the evaluation may be conducted under agreement with the local government by a consultant selected jointly by local government and the executive director of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30242.

All other lands suitable for agricultural use shall not be converted to nonagricultural uses unless (1) continued or renewed agricultural use is not feasible, or (2) such conversion would preserve prime agricultural land or concentrate development consistent with Section 30250. Any such permitted conversion shall be compatible with continued agricultural use on surrounding lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30243.

The long-term productivity of soils and timberlands shall be protected, and conversions of coastal commercial timberlands in units of commercial size to other uses or their division into units of noncommercial size shall be limited to providing for necessary timber processing and related facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30244.

Where development would adversely impact archaeological or paleontological resources as identified by the State Historic Preservation Officer, reasonable mitigation measures shall be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Development [30250. - 30255.]

30250.

(a) New residential, commercial, or industrial development, except as otherwise provided in this division, shall be located within, contiguous with, or in close proximity to, existing developed areas able to accommodate it or, where such areas are not able to accommodate it, in other areas with adequate public services and where it will not have significant adverse effects, either individually or cumulatively, on coastal resources. In addition, land divisions, other than leases for agricultural uses, outside existing developed areas shall be permitted only where 50 percent of the usable parcels in the area have been developed and the created parcels would be no smaller than the average size of surrounding parcels.

(b) Where feasible, new hazardous industrial development shall be located away from existing developed areas.

(c) Visitor-serving facilities that cannot feasibly be located in existing developed areas shall be located in existing isolated developments or at selected points of attraction for visitors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

30251.

The scenic and visual qualities of coastal areas shall be considered and protected as a resource of public importance. Permitted development shall be sited and designed to protect views to and along the ocean and scenic coastal areas, to minimize the alteration of natural land forms, to be visually compatible with the character of surrounding areas, and, where feasible, to restore and enhance visual quality in visually degraded areas. New development in highly scenic areas such as those designated in the California Coastline Preservation and Recreation Plan prepared by the Department of Parks and Recreation and by local government shall be subordinate to the character of its setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30252.

The location and amount of new development should maintain and enhance public access to the coast by (1) facilitating the provision or extension of transit service, (2) providing commercial facilities within or adjoining residential development or in other areas that will minimize the use of coastal access roads, (3) providing nonautomobile circulation within the development, (4) providing adequate parking facilities or providing substitute means of serving the development with public transportation, (5) assuring the potential for public transit for high intensity uses such as high-rise office buildings, and by (6) assuring that the recreational needs of new residents will not overload nearby coastal recreation areas by correlating the amount of development with local park acquisition and development plans with the provision of onsite recreational facilities to serve the new development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30253.

New development shall do all of the following:

(a) Minimize risks to life and property in areas of high geologic, flood, and fire hazard.

(b) Assure stability and structural integrity, and neither create nor contribute significantly to erosion, geologic instability, or destruction of the site or surrounding area or in any way require the construction of protective devices that would substantially alter natural landforms along bluffs and cliffs.

(c) Be consistent with requirements imposed by an air pollution control district or the State Air Resources Board as to each particular development.

(d) Minimize energy consumption and vehicle miles traveled.

(e) Where appropriate, protect special communities and neighborhoods that, because of their unique characteristics, are popular visitor destination points for recreational uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 187.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

30254.

New or expanded public works facilities shall be designed and limited to accommodate needs generated by development or uses permitted consistent with the provisions of this division; provided, however, that it is the intent of the Legislature that State Highway Route 1 in rural areas of the coastal zone remain a scenic two-lane road. Special districts shall not be formed or expanded except where assessment for, and provision of, the service would not induce new development inconsistent with this division. Where existing or planned public works facilities can accommodate only a limited amount of new development, services to coastal-dependent land use, essential public services and basic industries vital to the economic health of the region, state, or nation, public recreation, commercial recreation, and visitor-serving land uses shall not be precluded by other development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30254.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may not impose any term or condition on the development of any sewage treatment plant which is applicable to any future development that the commission finds can be accommodated by that plant consistent with this division. Nothing in this section modifies the provisions and requirements of Sections 30254 and 30412.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 978, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30255.

Coastal-dependent developments shall have priority over other developments on or near the shoreline. Except as provided elsewhere in this division, coastal-dependent developments shall not be sited in a wetland. When appropriate, coastal-related developments should be accommodated within reasonable proximity to the coastal-dependent uses they support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Industrial Development [30260. - 30265.5.]

30260.

(a) Coastal-dependent industrial facilities shall be encouraged to locate or expand within existing sites and shall be permitted reasonable long-term growth where consistent with this division.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), where new or expanded coastal-dependent industrial facilities cannot feasibly be accommodated consistent with other policies of this division, they may nonetheless be permitted in accordance with this section and Sections 30261 and 30262 if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Alternative locations are infeasible or more environmentally damaging.

(2) Permitting
 the development would not adversely affect the public welfare.

(3) Adverse environmental effects are mitigated to the maximum extent feasible.

(4) The new or expanded coastal-dependent industrial facility is not an oil and gas development, refinery, or petrochemical facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 292, Sec. 2.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30261.

Multicompany use of existing and new tanker facilities shall be encouraged to the maximum extent feasible and legally permissible, except where to do so would result in increased tanker operations and associated onshore development incompatible with the land use and environmental goals for the area. New tanker terminals outside of existing terminal areas shall be situated as to avoid risk to environmentally sensitive areas and shall use a monobuoy system, unless an alternative type of system can be shown to be environmentally preferable for a specific site. Tanker facilities shall be designed to (1) minimize the total volume of oil spilled, (2) minimize the risk of collision from movement of other vessels, (3) have ready access to the most effective feasible containment and recovery equipment for oilspills, and (4) have onshore deballasting facilities to receive any fouled ballast water from tankers where operationally or legally required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

30262.

(a) New or expanded oil and gas development shall not be considered a coastal-dependent industrial facility for the purposes of Section 30260, and may be permitted only if found to be consistent with all applicable provisions of this division and if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The development is performed safely and consistent with the geologic conditions of the well site.

(2) Activities related to that development are consolidated, to the maximum extent feasible and legally permissible, unless consolidation will have adverse environmental consequences and will not significantly reduce the number of producing wells, support facilities, or sites required to produce the reservoir
 economically and with minimal environmental impacts.

(3) The development will not cause or contribute to subsidence hazards unless it is determined that adequate measures will be undertaken to prevent damage from that subsidence.

(4) All oilfield brines are reinjected into oil-producing zones unless the Geologic Energy Management Division of the Department of Conservation determines to do so would adversely affect production of the reservoirs and unless injection into other subsurface zones will reduce environmental risks. Exceptions to reinjections will be granted consistent with the California Ocean Plan of the State Water Resources Control Board and where adequate provision is made for the elimination of petroleum odors and water quality problems.

(5) (A)All oil produced offshore California
 shall be transported onshore by pipeline only. The pipelines used to transport this oil shall utilize the best achievable technology to ensure maximum protection of public health and safety and of the integrity and productivity of terrestrial and marine ecosystems.

(B) Once oil produced offshore California is onshore, it shall be transported to processing and refining facilities by pipeline that uses the best available technology pursuant to Section 51013.1 of the Government Code.

(C) The following guidelines shall be used when applying subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(i) “Best achievable technology,” means the technology
 that provides the greatest degree of protection taking into consideration both of the following:

(I) Processes that are being developed, or could feasibly be developed, anywhere in the world, given overall reasonable expenditures on research and development.
